Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-669
Traffic, defined.

Traffic shall mean pedestrians, ridden or herded animals, and vehicles and other conveyances either singly or together while using any highway for purposes of travel.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 165.